Utah statutes.
59-14-204.5.   Application of excise tax on tribal lands.

(1) (a)  Cigarettes sold to or received by members of a federally recognized Indian tribe that are purchased or received on the tribal lands are not subject to the tax imposed by Section 59-14-204.

(b)  Cigarettes exempt from tax under Section 5704, Internal Revenue Code, and distributed in accordance with federal regulations are not subject to the tax imposed by Section 59-14-204.

(2) (a) (i)  The tax applicable to cigarettes sold to or received by nontribal members on tribal lands is equal to the state tax imposed by Section 59-14-204, minus any tribal tax actually paid.

(ii)  For purposes of this section, nontribal members includes any person who is not a member of the Indian tribe that is selling the cigarettes.

(b)  If the application of the tax offset for tribal taxes permitted in Subsection (2)(a) results in a negative balance, the taxes owed to the state are zero.

(c) (i)  Cigarettes taxed pursuant to this Subsection (2) shall bear a tax stamp as required by Section 59-14-205 in an amount equal to the tax imposed by Section 59-14-204.

(ii)  The commission shall at least semi-annually rebate to an Indian tribal entity that is in compliance with this chapter the lesser of:

(A)  an amount equal to the tribal tax imposed on sales under this Subsection (2); or

(B)  the face value of the tax stamps affixed to cigarettes sold under this Subsection (2).

